Utah statutes.
4-38-14.   Hearings.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, all proceedings before the
commission or its hearing officer with respect to the denial, suspension, or
revocation of licenses or the imposition of fines shall be conducted pursuant
to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  These proceedings shall be held in the county where the commission has
its office or in any other place the commission designates.  The commission
shall notify the applicant or licensee by mailing, by first class mail, a copy
of the written notice required to the last address furnished by the
application or licensee to the commission at least seven days in advance of
the hearing.
(3)  The commission may delegate its authority to conduct hearings with
respect to the denial or suspension of licenses or the imposition of a fine to
a hearing officer.
(4)  Proceedings before the board of stewards need not be governed by the
procedural or other requirements of the Administrative Procedures Act, but
rather shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.
(5)  The commission and the board of stewards may administer oaths and
affirmations, sign and issue subpoenas, order the production of documents and
other evidence, and regulate the course of the hearing pursuant to rules
adopted by it.
(6)  Any person aggrieved by a final order or ruling issued by a board of
stewards may appeal the order or ruling to the commission pursuant to
procedural rules adopted by the commission.  The aggrieved party may petition
the commission for a stay of execution pending appeal to the commission.
